Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.070

Authority of joint boards to receive loans or grants.

Any joint board created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is hereby authorized to accept loans or grants of federal, state or private funds in order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter provided each of the participating public agencies is authorized by law to receive such funds.

[ 1967 c 239 s 8.]